Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) At least  quarterly, each county treasurer shall provide to the presiding
judge of  the judicial district in which the county is located a financial report showing the
balance and all expenditures from the county’s accounts  for conciliation services under ORS
107.510 to 107.610 and mediation services under ORS 107.755 to 107.795. The  county treasurer
may charge against the conciliation and  mediation accounts the actual costs associated with
providing financial reports under this subsection.
(2) Each fiscal year, the presiding judge of each judicial district shall  provide to the State
Court Administrator a financial report showing the fund  balance and all expenditures from
the conciliation and mediation accounts for the fiscal year.
(3) The State Court Administrator may prescribe the format  and due dates of the reports
required under this section.
SECTION 2.  ORS 107.615 is amended to read:
107.615. (1) The  governing body of any county may impose a fee up to [ $10] $35  above that
prescribed in ORS 205.320 (1)(e) for issuing a marriage  license or registering a Declaration of Do-
mestic Partnership.
(2) The governing body may periodically increase the fee in subsection (1) of this  section
to account for changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West  Region
(All Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department
of Labor, since the last time the fee was increased. If the governing body increases the fee
under this subsection, the adjusted  maximum fee shall be rounded to the nearest quarter
dollar, but the unrounded amount shall be  used to calculate subsequent adjustments. The
increased fee becomes effective on July 1 following the  election to increase the fee and ap-
plies to marriage licenses issued and  Declarations of Domestic Partnership registered on or
after the effective date of the increased fee.
[(2)] (3) In addition to any other funds used therefor, the  governing body shall use the proceeds
from the fee increase authorized by this section to pay the expenses of conciliation  services under
ORS 107.510 to 107.610 and mediation services under  ORS 107.755 to 107.795. If there are none in
the county,  the governing body may provide conciliation and mediation services through other
Enrolled Senate Bill 97 (SB 97-A) Page 1
county agencies or may contract  with a public or private agency or person to provide conciliation
and mediation services.
[(3)] (4)  The governing body may establish rules of eligibility for conciliation  services funded
under this section so long as its rules do not conflict with rules of the court adopted under  ORS
107.580.
[(4)] (5)  Fees collected  under this section shall be collected and deposited in the same manner
as other county funds are collected and deposited but shall be maintained in a  separate account to
be used as provided in this section.
SECTION 3. (1) The quarterly reports described in section 1 of this 2025 Act are first  due
on or before October 31, 2025.
(2) The annual  reports described in section 1 of this 2025 Act are first due on or before
July 31, 2026.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 97 (SB 97-A) Page 2